North Carolina, session 2025, SB824.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one million two hundred thirty-seven thousand dollars ($1,237,000)
in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to Edgecombe County
Public Schools to be used to provide at least one full-time, permanent school nurse in each public
school in Edgecombe County. Funds provided pursuant to this act shall supplement and not
supplant any funds from any source already provided for the same purposes.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one million six hundred seventy-eight thousand dollars
($1,678,000) in recurring funds beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated to Pitt
County Schools to be used to provide at least one full-time, permanent school nurse in each public
school in Pitt County. Funds provided pursuant to this act shall supplement and not supplant any
funds from any source already provided for the same purposes.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*S824-v-1*